Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1 Water Quality Control Act
69-3-115. Violations — Penalties — Judgment by consent.

Any person who does any of the following acts or omissions is subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for each day during which the act or omission continues or occurs:

Violates an effluent standard or limitation or a water quality standard established under this part;

Violates the terms or conditions of a permit;

Fails to complete a filing requirement or causes false information to be filed with the department;

Fails to allow or perform an entry, inspection, monitoring, or reporting requirement;

Violates a final determination or order of the board, panel or commissioner;

In the case of an industrial user of a publicly owned treatment works, fails to pay user or cost recovery charges or violates pretreatment standards or toxic effluent limitations established as a condition in the permit of the treatment works;

After reasonable notice and opportunity to restore a ditch constructed pursuant to § 69-3-130, the owner of the property fails to restore the ditch to permit specifications; or

Violates any other provision of this part or any rule or regulation promulgated by the board.

Any civil penalty shall be assessed in the following manner:

The commissioner may issue an assessment against any person responsible for the violation;

Any person against whom an assessment has been issued may secure a review of such assessment by filing with the commissioner a written petition setting forth the grounds and reasons for the objections, and asking for a hearing in the matter involved before the board. If a petition for review of the assessment is not filed within thirty (30) days after the date the assessment is served, the violator shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment and it shall become final;

Whenever any assessment has become final because of a person's failure to appeal the commissioner's assessment, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment and seek execution of such judgment and the court, in such proceedings, shall treat a failure to appeal such assessment as a confession of judgment in the amount of the assessment; and

The commissioner, through the attorney general and reporter, may institute proceedings for assessment in the chancery court of Davidson County or in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the pollution or violation occurred, in the name of the department.

In assessing the civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the following factors:

Whether the civil penalty imposed will be a substantial economic deterrent to the illegal activity;

Damages to the state, including compensation for loss or destruction of wildlife, fish, and other aquatic life, resulting from the violation, as well as expenses involved in enforcing this section and the costs involved in rectifying any damage;

Cause of the discharge or violation;

The severity of the discharge and its effect upon the quality and quantity of the receiving waters;

Effectiveness of action taken by the violator to cease the violation;

The technical and economic reasonableness of reducing or eliminating the discharge;

The social and economic value of the discharge source; and

The economic benefit gained by the violator.

The board may establish by regulation a schedule of the amount of civil penalty that can be assessed by the commissioner for certain specific violations or categories of violations.

Any person unlawfully polluting the waters of the state or violating or failing, neglecting, or refusing to comply with any of the provisions of this part, commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day upon which such violation occurs constitutes a separate offense.

Any person who willfully and knowingly falsifies any records, information, plans, specifications, or other data required by the board or the commissioner, or who willfully and knowingly pollutes the waters of the state, or willfully fails, neglects or refuses to comply with any of the provisions of this part commits a Class E felony and shall be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or incarceration, or both.

The department is the sole state agency authorized to conduct investigations arising under this part. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, other state agencies may assist the department in satisfying the duties arising under this part. The department of agriculture shall be notified of investigations associated with agricultural activities.

Whenever any order or assessment has become a final action under this section, a notarized copy of the same may be filed in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of Davidson County, and shall be considered as an agreement of the parties thereto to entry of a judgment by consent, the terms and conditions of which shall be the same as those recited in the final order or assessment. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the procedures for entry of the judgment and the effect thereof shall be the same as provided in title 26, chapter 6.

If the final action is by the board, the judgment by consent shall be promptly entered by the court and shall be effective upon entry, and it shall have the same effect and be subject to the same procedures as a judgment of a court of record of this state and may be enforced or satisfied in like manner.

If the final action is by the commissioner, the judgment by consent shall be promptly entered by the chancery court, but shall not become a final judgment until expiration of a period ending forty-five (45) days after the date it was filed. During this period, any citizen shall have the right to intervene in such proceeding on the grounds that the remedy or remedies provided are inadequate or are based on erroneously stated facts. If intervention occurs, the court shall determine whether it is duplicitous or frivolous and shall notify the parties and the intervenor of its determination. If determined not to be duplicitous or frivolous, review of the order or assessment shall be deemed to be sought by all parties and shall proceed in accordance with § 4-5-322. If no citizen intervenes or if any such intervention is deemed duplicitous or frivolous, upon the expiration of the forty-five-day period, the judgment by consent shall be final, and it shall have the same effect and be subject to the same procedures as a judgment of a court of record of this state and may be enforced or satisfied in like manner.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 14; 1971, ch. 386, § 7; 1972, ch. 631, § 3; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; 1979, ch. 422, § 21; T.C.A., § 70-337; Acts 1985, ch. 160, § 1; 1988, ch. 688, § 1; 1989, ch. 321, § 10; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 101, 113; 1991, ch. 123, § 3; 2007, ch. 362, § 19; 2017, ch. 148, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 321, § 15 provided that the amendment of this section by that act does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities that were incurred, or proceedings begun before May 18, 1989.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Pretreatment enforcement, penalties, §69-3-125.

69-3-116. Damages to the state.

The commissioner may assess the liability of any polluter or violator for damages to the state resulting from any person's pollution or violation, failure, or neglect in complying with any rules, regulations, or standards of water quality promulgated by the board or permits or orders issued pursuant to this part.

If an appeal from such assessment is not made to the board by the polluter or violator within thirty (30) days of notification of such assessment, the pollutor or violator shall be deemed to have consented to such assessment and it shall become final.

Damages may include any expenses incurred in investigating and enforcing this part, in removing, correcting, and terminating any pollution, and also compensation for any loss or destruction of wildlife, fish, or aquatic life and any other actual damages caused by the pollution or violation.

Whenever any assessment has become final because of a person's failure to appeal within the time provided, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment, and seek execution on such judgment. The court, in such proceedings, shall treat the failure to appeal such assessment as a confession of judgment in the amount of the assessment.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 15; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-338.

69-3-117. Proceedings against violators — Injunctions.

The commissioner may initiate proceedings in the chancery court of Davidson County or the county in which the activities occurred against any person who is alleged to have violated or is about to violate this part, conditions of permits issued under this part, the rules and regulations of the board or orders of the board or commissioner. In such action the commissioner may seek, and the court may grant, injunctive relief and any other relief available in law or equity. Specifically, the commissioner may seek injunctive relief against industrial users of publicly owned treatment works who fail to pay user or cost recovery charges or who violate pretreatment standards or toxic effluent limitations established as a condition to the permit of the treatment works.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 16; 1972, ch. 444, § 1; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; 1979, ch. 422, § 22; T.C.A., § 70-339; Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 9.

69-3-118. Other remedies.

Any person may file with the commissioner a signed complaint against any person allegedly violating any provisions of this part. Unless the commissioner determines that such complaint is duplicitous or frivolous, the commissioner shall immediately serve a copy of it upon the person or persons named in the complaint, promptly investigate the allegations contained in the complaint, and notify the alleged violator of what action, if any, the commissioner will take. In all cases, the commissioner shall notify the complainant of the action or determination within ninety (90) days from the date of the commissioner's receipt of the written complaint.

If either the complainant or the alleged violator believes that the commissioner's action or determination is or will be inadequate or too severe, such person may appeal to the board for a hearing, which will be conducted pursuant to § 69-3-110. The appeal must be made within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notification sent by the commissioner.

If the commissioner fails to take the action stated in the notification, the complainant may make an appeal to the board within thirty (30) days from the time at which the complainant knows or has reason to know of such failure.

The department shall not be obligated to assist a complainant in gathering information or making investigations or to provide counsel for the purpose of drawing up the complaint.

The penalties, damages, and injunctions provided for in §§ 69-3-115 — 69-3-119 are intended to provide additional and cumulative remedies to prevent, abate, and control the pollution of the waters of the state. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in equity or under common law or statutory law, criminal or civil, nor shall any provision of §§ 69-3-115 — 69-3-117 or this section, or any act done by virtue thereof, be construed as estopping the state or any municipality or person, as riparian owners or otherwise, in the exercise of their rights in equity or under the common law or statutory law to suppress nuisances, to abate pollution, or to recover damages resulting from such pollution.

The board, department or its officials and employees acting in their official capacity shall not be considered “persons” pursuant to this section.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 17; 1971, ch. 386, § 8; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-340; Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 10.

69-3-119. Disposition of fees, penalties and damages.

All fees, penalties, and damages assessed and collected under this part shall be placed in a special fund and earmarked, allocated, and appropriated to the division for the purpose of complying with this part. Any unexpended balance of the special fund in any fiscal year shall revert to the general fund.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 18; 1971, ch. 386, § 9; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-341; Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 11; 1992, ch. 693, § 1.

69-3-120. Construction of part.

This part is intended to supplement other provisions of the Tennessee Code Annotated, and no part thereof shall be construed to repeal any such provisions specifically enacted for the protection of health or the protection of fish and game of the state, except that the administration of any laws pertaining to the pollution of waters as defined in § 69-3-103 shall be in accordance with the general policies and regulations adopted by the board.

All sections in this part shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of its policy and purpose.

All grants of power to the board or commissioner shall be liberally construed.

Any list in this part preceded by “include” or “including” shall not be construed as exhaustive or otherwise limiting unless specifically stated.

All procedures in this part are intended to be in conformity with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. If any provision of this part conflicts with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, then the latter shall govern.

If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or words of this part are for any reason held to be invalid, such decree shall not affect the validity of any remaining portion of this part.

Nothing whatsoever in this part shall be so construed as applying to any agricultural or forestry activity or the activities necessary to the conduct and operations thereof or to any lands devoted to the production of any agricultural or forestry products, unless there is a point source discharge from a discernible, confined, and discrete water conveyance.

The passage of the Water Quality Control Act of 1977 shall grant no new authority over non-point sources to the department, which was not previously established by the Water Quality Control Act of 1971. In all cases of conflict between this part and §§ 68-221-101 — 68-221-108, the Sanitary Engineering Law, this part shall take precedence.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 19; 1977, ch. 366, §§ 1, 3; T.C.A., § 70-342; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Water Quality Control Act of 1971, referred to in this section, was enacted by Acts 1971, ch. 164 and compiled as former §§ 70-324 — 70-342 as they existed prior to the enactment of Acts 1977, ch. 366.

69-3-121. Continuation of rules and regulations, permits, contracts and agreements.

The rules and regulations previously promulgated under the Water Quality Control Act of 1971 shall remain in effect as the rules and regulations under this part. Any of these rules or regulations that may conflict with a statutory provision of this part are hereby rendered void, but shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules and regulations.

All permits and temporary permits issued under the Water Quality Control Act of 1971 shall remain in effect under this part until such time as they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this part.

Any contracts, agreements, plans or any other documents developed under the Water Quality Control Act of 1971 shall remain in effect under this part.

Acts 1977, ch. 366, § 2; T.C.A., § 70-343.

Compiler's Notes. The Water Quality Control Act of 1971, referred to in this section, was enacted by Acts 1971, ch. 164 and compiled as former §§ 70-324 — 70-342 as they existed prior to the enactment of Acts 1977, ch. 366.

69-3-122. Sewerage system contractors or operators — Bonds or security — Noncomplying or abandoned facilities.

No person shall construct, operate or hold out to the public as proposing to construct or operate a sewerage system unless such person first provides a bond or other financial security to the department, and has received approval of the same.

The board may by regulation establish the amount and form of such bond or financial security for various sizes and types of facilities. In no case shall the amount of the bond or financial security exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). The purpose of the bond or financial security shall be the protection of the public health, welfare, and the environment of the state.

The commissioner may petition the chancery court of the county in which the facility is located for forfeiture of the bond or other financial security, if the department determines that:

The continued operation or lack of operation of a facility covered by this section represents a threat to the health of the public or is causing or will cause violations of classified water uses that the board has established;

All reasonable and practical efforts under the circumstances have been made to obtain corrective actions from persons responsible for the facility; and

It does not appear that corrective actions can or will be taken within an appropriate time or it appears that the facility has been abandoned.

The proceeds of such forfeiture shall be paid into the court and, pursuant to the order of the court, used in combination with any remedy provided by law or equity that will correct or mitigate the noncompliance of such facility.

If the court finds that a facility covered by this section has been abandoned or that services of the facility have been terminated, the court may enter such orders regarding the continued operations of such facility as it deems necessary to protect the public.

This section does not apply to the following:

Facilities owned or operated by a governmental entity or agency; or

Facilities in operation prior to May 25, 1984.

Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 12.

69-3-123. Pretreatment enforcement — Procedure — Complaints — Orders.

Whenever the local administrative officer of any pretreatment agency has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of the pretreatment program of the pretreatment agency or orders of the local hearing authority issued pursuant thereto has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur, the local administrative officer may cause a written complaint to be served upon the alleged violator or violators.

The complaint shall specify the provision or provisions of the pretreatment program or order alleged to be violated or about to be violated and the facts alleged to constitute a violation thereof, may order that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in such order, and shall inform the violators of the opportunity for a hearing before the local hearing authority.

Any such order shall become final and not subject to review unless the person or persons named in the order request by written petition a hearing before the local hearing authority as provided in § 69-3-124, no later than thirty (30) days after the date such order is served; provided, that the local hearing authority may review such final order on the same grounds upon which a court of the state may review default judgments.

Whenever the local administrative officer finds that an emergency exists imperatively requiring immediate action to protect the public health, safety, or welfare, the health of animals, fish or aquatic life, a public water supply, or the facilities of the publicly owned treatment works of the pretreatment agency, the local administrative officer may, without prior notice, issue an order reciting the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken as the local administrative officer deems necessary to meet the emergency.

If the violator fails to respond or is unable to respond to the local administrative officer's order, the local administrative officer may take such emergency action as the local administrative officer deems necessary, or contract with a qualified person or persons to carry out the emergency measures. The local administrative officer may assess the person or persons responsible for the emergency condition for actual costs incurred by the local administrative officer in meeting the emergency.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any notice, complaint, order or other instrument issued by or under authority of this part may be served on any person affected thereby personally, by the local administrative officer or any person designated by the local administrative officer, or such service may be made in accordance with Tennessee statutes authorizing service of process in a civil action. Proof of service shall be filed in the office of the local administrative officer.

Acts 1987, ch. 111, § 2.

69-3-124. Pretreatment enforcement — Hearings.

Any hearing or rehearing brought before the local hearing authority shall be conducted in accordance with the following:

Upon receipt of a written petition from the alleged violator pursuant to this section, the local administrative officer shall give the petitioner thirty (30) days' written notice of the time and place of the hearing, but in no case shall such hearing be held more than sixty (60) days from the receipt of the written petition, unless the local administrative officer and the petitioner agree to a postponement;

The hearing provided for in this section may be conducted by the local hearing authority at a regular or special meeting. A quorum of the local hearing authority must be present at the regular or special meeting in order to conduct the hearing provided for in this section;

A verbatim record of the proceedings of such hearings shall be taken and filed with the local hearing authority, together with the findings of fact and conclusions of law made pursuant to subdivision (a)(6). The transcript so recorded shall be made available to the petitioner or any party to a hearing upon payment of a charge set by the local administrative officer to cover the costs of preparation;

In connection with the hearing, the chair shall issue subpoenas in response to any reasonable request by any party to the hearing requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence relevant to any matter involved in the hearing. In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a notice of hearing or subpoena issued under this section, the chancery court of the county in which the pretreatment agency is located shall have jurisdiction upon the application of the local hearing authority or the local administrative officer to issue an order requiring such person to appear and testify or produce evidence as the case may require, and any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by such court as contempt;

Any member of the local hearing authority may administer oaths and examine witnesses;

On the basis of the evidence produced at the hearing, the local hearing authority shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and enter such decisions and orders as, in its opinion, will best further the purposes of the pretreatment program and shall give written notice of such decisions and orders to the alleged violator. The order issued under this subsection (a) shall be issued no later than thirty (30) days following the close of the hearing by the person or persons designated by the chair;

The decision of the local hearing authority shall become final and binding on all parties unless appealed to the courts as provided in subsection (b); and

Any person to whom an emergency order is directed pursuant to § 69-3-123 shall comply with the emergency order immediately, but on petition to the local hearing authority shall be afforded a hearing as soon as possible, but in no case shall such hearing be held later than three (3) days from the receipt of such petition by the local hearing authority.

An appeal may be taken from any final order or other final determination of the local hearing authority by any party, including the pretreatment agency, who is or may be adversely affected thereby, to the chancery court pursuant to the common law writ of certiorari set out in § 27-8-101, within sixty (60) days from the date such order or determination is made.

Acts 1987, ch. 111, § 3.

Cross-References. Contempt of court, title 29, ch. 9.

69-3-125. Pretreatment enforcement — Violations — Civil penalty.

Any person, including, but not limited to, industrial users, who does any of the following acts or omissions shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for each day during which the act or omission continues or occurs:

Violates an effluent standard or limitation imposed by a pretreatment program;

Violates the terms or conditions of a permit issued pursuant to a pretreatment program;

Fails to complete a filing requirement of a pretreatment program;

Fails to allow or perform an entry, inspection, monitoring or reporting requirement of a pretreatment program;

Fails to pay user or cost recovery charges imposed by a pretreatment program; or

Violates a final determination or order of the local hearing authority or the local administrative officer.

Any civil penalty shall be assessed in the following manner:

The local administrative officer may issue an assessment against any person or industrial user responsible for the violation;

Any person or industrial user against whom an assessment has been issued may secure a review of such assessment by filing with the local administrative officer a written petition setting forth the grounds and reasons for the violator's objections and asking for a hearing in the matter involved before the local hearing authority and, if a petition for review of the assessment is not filed within thirty (30) days after the date the assessment is served, the violator shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment and it shall become final;

Whenever any assessment has become final because of a person's failure to appeal the local administrative officer's assessment, the local administrative officer may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment and seek execution of such judgment and the court, in such proceedings, shall treat a failure to appeal such assessment as a confession of judgment in the amount of the assessment;

In assessing the civil penalty, the local administrative officer may consider the following factors:

Whether the civil penalty imposed will be a substantial economic deterrent to the illegal activity;

Damages to the pretreatment agency, including compensation for the damage or destruction of the facilities of the publicly owned treatment works, and also including any penalties, costs and attorneys' fees incurred by the pretreatment agency as the result of the illegal activity, as well as the expenses involved in enforcing this section and the costs involved in rectifying any damages;

Cause of the discharge or violation;

The severity of the discharge and its effect upon the facilities of the publicly owned treatment works and upon the quality and quantity of the receiving waters;

Effectiveness of action taken by the violator to cease the violation;

The technical and economic reasonableness of reducing or eliminating the discharge; and

The economic benefit gained by the violator; and

The local administrative officer may institute proceedings for assessment in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the pollution or violation occurred, in the name of the pretreatment agency.

The local hearing authority may establish by regulation a schedule of the amount of civil penalty that can be assessed by the local administrative officer for certain specific violations or categories of violations.

Any civil penalty assessed to a violator pursuant to this section may be in addition to any civil penalty assessed by the commissioner for violations of § 69-3-115(a)(1)(F). However, the sum of penalties imposed by this section and by § 69-3-115(a) shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for each day during which the act or omission continues or occurs. The state's share of any additional costs of this section shall be funded in accordance with § 9-4-5303, from the increase in state imposed taxes that are earmarked to counties and that are not designated by such counties for a particular purpose.

Acts 1987, ch. 111, § 4.

69-3-126. Pretreatment enforcement — Assessment for noncompliance with program permits or orders.

The local administrative officer may assess the liability of any polluter or violator for damages to the pretreatment agency resulting from any person's or industrial user's pollution or violation, failure, or neglect in complying with any permits or orders issued pursuant to the pretreatment program or § 69-3-123, § 69-3-124, or § 69-3-125.

If an appeal from such assessment is not made to the local hearing authority by the polluter or violator within thirty (30) days of notification of such assessment, the polluter or violator shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment, and it shall become final.

Damages may include any expenses incurred in investigating and enforcing the pretreatment program or §§ 69-3-123 — 69-3-129, in removing, correcting, and terminating any pollution, and also compensation for any actual damages caused by the pollution or violation.

Whenever any assessment has become final because of a person's failure to appeal within the time provided, the local administrative officer may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment, and seek execution on such judgment. The court, in such proceedings, shall treat the failure to appeal such assessment as a confession of judgment in the amount of the assessment.

Acts 1987, ch. 111, § 5.

69-3-127. Pretreatment enforcement — Judicial proceedings and relief.

The local administrative officer may initiate proceedings in the chancery court of the county in which the activities occurred against any person or industrial user who is alleged to have violated or is about to violate the pretreatment program, §§69-3-123 —69-3-129, or orders of the local hearing authority or local administrative officer. In such action, the local administrative officer may seek, and the court may grant, injunctive relief and any other relief available in law or equity.

Acts 1987, ch. 111, § 6.

69-3-128. Pretreatment enforcement.

Any net increase in expenditures after subtracting out net gains from penalties and damage payments received by a local governmental entity pursuant to §§69-3-123 —69-3-129 shall be borne equally by the local governmental entity and by the department. The local governmental entity shall document and verify its expenditures before receiving reimbursement from the department.

Acts 1987, ch. 111, § 8; 1992, ch. 693, § 1.

69-3-129. Disposition of damage payments and penalties — Special fund.

All damages or penalties, or both, assessed and collected under §§69-3-123 —69-3-128 shall be placed in a special fund by the pretreatment agency and allocated and appropriated to the pretreatment agency for the administration of its pretreatment program.

Acts 1987, ch. 111, § 7.

69-3-130. Ditch construction.

Ditch construction, the purpose of which is either to:

Restore swamped-out bottomland hardwoods to bottomland hardwoods; or

Restore swamped-out cropland to cropland or to bottomland hardwoods;

is permitted in any waters of this state, under general permit and without requirement of an individual permit; provided, that it is done in accordance with all terms and conditions of this section.

The following conditions apply to all ditch construction conducted under this section:

Written notification to the department shall be made at least thirty (30) days prior to beginning construction, and shall include:

Aerial photographs showing existing conditions, or in the case of land used for pasture, documentation from a state or federal agency establishing prior usage as pasture;

A simple sketch showing approximate dimensions of the proposed ditch and anticipated affected area; and

Documentation that the area is either swamped-out hardwoods or swamped-out cropland;

All construction shall be accomplished during periods of dry weather;

Construction shall be by blasting, if feasible, although construction by other means is permissible if blasting is not practicable under the circumstances; and

Construction may commence after thirty (30) days notification to the department unless the commissioner notifies the applicant that:

The documentation regarding the qualification of the property as swamped-out bottomland hardwoods or swamped-out cropland is inadequate;

The proposed ditch will drain adjacent wetlands beyond the swamped-out cropland or swamped-out bottomland; or

The department's review of the proposal will require an additional time period not to exceed sixty (60) days.

As used in this subsection (b), “ditch maintenance” means the physical maintenance of the original, as built, configuration of a ditch, including the removal of sediment, debris or obstruction, the purpose of which is to:

Maintain bottomland hardwoods or cropland;

Restore swamped-out bottomland hardwoods to bottomland hardwoods; or

Restore swamped-out croplands to cropland or to bottomland hardwoods.

Ditch maintenance is permitted under general permit and without requirement of an individual permit in any water of the state under the following conditions:

All construction shall be accomplished during periods of dry weather;

The ditch maintenance activity shall not alter any other waters of the state; and

The ditch maintenance activity shall not result in the extension of the ditch in length, width or depth from its original dimensions.

Ditch construction that is for the purpose of maintaining existing bottomland hardwoods or cropland, and that requires a permit under § 404 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1344), is permitted under general permit and without requirement of individual permit in any water of the state under the following conditions:

Written notification to the department shall be made at least thirty (30) days prior to beginning construction, and shall include:

A copy of the § 404 permit; and

A simple sketch showing approximate dimensions of the proposed ditch and anticipated affected area;

All construction shall be accomplished during periods of dry weather;

Construction should be by blasting, if feasible, although construction by other means is permissible if blasting is not practicable under the circumstances; and

Construction may commence after thirty (30) days notification to the department unless the commissioner notifies the applicant that:

The documentation is inadequate;

The proposed ditch will drain adjacent wetlands beyond the affected cropland or bottomland; or

The department's review of the proposed construction will require an additional time period not to exceed sixty (60) days.

If ditch construction or ditch maintenance exceeds the permit specifications, then the owner of the property upon which the ditch is constructed shall be required to restore the ditch to the specifications of the permit. The owner of the property upon which the ditch is constructed shall be required to pay all costs of ditch restoration.

The general permits granted by this section shall not be subject to the durational limit set forth in § 69-3-108.

The establishment of the general permit granted by this section shall not preclude application for individual permit for ditch construction or ditch maintenance in cropland or bottomland hardwoods swamped-out prior to 1970.

This section shall not be construed as requiring a permit for any activity not requiring a permit under the federal Clean Water Act or the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.).

Acts 1991, ch. 123, § 2.

69-3-131. Rules and regulations.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, which rules and regulations shall govern the manner in which emergency repairs made in accordance with §69-3-108(n) must be made. The department shall send a copy of such rules and regulations to each county highway department in the state.

Acts 1993, ch. 155, § 2.

69-3-132. Advisory committee to assist removal of debris from streams and stabilization of stream banks.

There is hereby created an advisory committee to the division of water pollution control to advise and assist the division on procedures and policies concerning the application of this part to the removal of debris from streams and stabilization of stream banks. The members of the committee shall serve without compensation and shall be appointed by the commissioner to include representatives from local government, farmers, the natural resource conservation service, the University of Tennessee extension, and environmental groups. Meetings of this committee shall be held in counties with a large number of situations where these activities are needed.

Acts 1998, ch. 659, § 3; 2004, ch. 517, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 15 provided that the University of Tennessee extension service shall spend no funds beyond those currently budgeted to accelerate the replacement of signs, letterhead, and business cards on account of the provisions of the act.

69-3-133. Stop work order.

When certain silvicultural activities have polluted waters of the state as a result of an operator's failure or refusal to use forestry best management practices, the commissioner of environment and conservation may issue a stop work order to the operator. If the owner is different than the operator, the commissioner shall at the same time notify the owner that a stop work order has been issued to the operator by delivering a copy of the stop work order to the owner. The stop work order requires that the operator must cease part or all of the silvicultural activities on site that are contributing to such pollution. The stop work order will remain in effect until the operator installs forestry best management practices that eliminate and prevent further pollution associated with the silvicultural activities. No stop work order may be issued or suspended without consultation with the commissioner of agriculture.

Acts 2000, ch. 680, § 2.

69-3-134. Written notice of conduct violation.

No operator who at any time within the previous two (2) years has been found to have violated this part in the conduct of silvicultural activities, such finding of violation not having been overturned or reversed on appeal, shall start any silvicultural activities, unless the operator, at least ten (10) days prior to the start of any silvicultural activities has filed a written notification, with the commissioner of agriculture and the commissioner of environment and conservation, including the following information:

The name and address of the operator and, if different than the owner, the name and address of the owner;

The location of the silvicultural activities and estimated acreage; and

The anticipated beginning date and anticipated length of the silvicultural activities.

Acts 2000, ch. 680, § 3.